South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4627.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-1-325.  (A) The Director of the Department of Public Health shall create within the department the Division of Women's Health. The division has, without limitation, the following duties: (1) assisting in the assessment of the health needs of women in the State; (2) recommending treatment methods and programs that are sensitive and relevant to the unique characteristics of women; (3) promoting awareness of women's health concerns including, but not limited to, heart disease, stroke, diabetes, maternal health issues, urinary tract infections, human papillomavirus (HPV), breast cancer, cervical cancer, ovarian cancer, osteoporosis, Alzheimer's disease, and mental health issues; and (4) encouraging, promoting, and aiding in the establishment of women's health services across the State. (B) The Division of Women's Health shall complete an annual assessment in collaboration with the schools of public health in South Carolina of the status of women's health and recommend policy developments to address those needs and identify the services needed. The division shall review the assessment and make recommendations to the General Assembly to address health disparities among women. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----